North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4-01 Agriculture Commissioner [Repealed]

4-01-01.
Agriculture commissioner is state statistician. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 122, § 2.

4-01-02.
Failure to give statistics or information to assessors. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 122, § 2.

4-01-03.
Statistics furnished state statistician by assessors. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 122, § 2.

4-01-04.
What statistical statement to contain. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1969, ch. 130, § 9.

4-01-05.
Statistics — How obtained. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1969, ch. 130, § 9.

4-01-06.
Blanks — Who to furnish. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 122, § 2.

4-01-07.
County auditor to send statistical statements to state statistician — Failure to do so, penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 122, § 2.

4-01-08.
Compensation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1969, ch. 130, § 9.

4-01-09.
Failure of assessor to make proper return — Compensation withheld — Statement returned — Complaint against — Duty of auditor. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1969, ch. 130, § 9.

4-01-10.
Failure of assessor to make return — Appointment of person to complete statistics. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 122, § 2.

4-01-11.
Penalty for neglect or refusal to perform duties. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 122, § 2.

4-01-12.
County auditor to furnish statistics to state statistician. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 122, § 2.

4-01-13.
Duty of state statistician. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 122, § 2.

4-01-14.
Expenses to be paid by state. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 122, § 2.

4-01-15.
Compelling attendance of witnesses and production of books and papers. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 46, § 5; R.C. 1895, § 126; R.C. 1899, § 126; R.C. 1905, § 130; C.L. 1913, § 166; R.C. 1943, § 4-0115; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-01-16.
Exhibits at fairs — Commissioner to have charge. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 46, § 9; R.C. 1895, § 128; S.L. 1899, ch. 44, § 3; R.C. 1899, § 128; R.C. 1905, § 132; C.L. 1913, § 168; R.C. 1943, § 4-0116; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-01-17.
European corn borer — Regulations governing control. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1973, ch. 50, § 1.

4-01-17.1.
State to cooperate with the animal and plant health inspection service and other agencies in destruction of predatory animals, destructive birds, and injurious field rodents. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 1; 1987, ch. 79, § 1; 1991, ch. 231, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 2009, ch. 67, §
1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-01-17.2.
Expenditures authorized — Who to approve vouchers — Qualifications of hunters and trappers hired — When bounties not payable. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 2; 1987, ch. 79, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-01-17.3.
Disposition of proceeds of furs, skins, and specimens taken. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 3; 1987, ch. 79, § 3; 2005, ch. 56, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-01-18.
Obstructing commissioner — Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673.

4-01-19.
Marketing bureau. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 10, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 4-0119; S.L. 1993, ch. 5, § 14; 1995, ch. 108, § 1; 2009, ch. 9, § 10; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-01-19.1.
Marketing bureau — Participation with export trading companies. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 590, § 4.

4-01-19.2.
Farm credit counseling program. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 131, § 5.

Note.

For present provisions, see § 6-09.10-03.

4-01-19.3.
Reports on farm credit counseling program. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 131, § 5.

4-01-20.
Commissioner to preserve records of commissioner of immigration. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1933, ch. 190, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 4-0120; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-01-21.
Salary of agriculture commissioner. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 47, § 1; R.C. 1895, § 131; R.C. 1899, § 131; R.C. 1905, § 135; S.L. 1909, ch. 216, § 4; C.L. 1913, § 171; I.M. November 8, 1932, § 1; S.L. 1933, p. 504, § 1; 1943, ch. 202, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 4-0121; S.L. 1951, ch. 305, § 1; 1957, ch. 335, § 1; 1957 Supp.; § 4-0121; S.L. 1965, ch. 344, § 1; 1973, ch. 417, § 1; 1977, ch. 480, § 1; 1981, ch. 521, § 1; 1983, ch. 44, § 7; 1985, ch. 560, § 1; 1989, ch. 1, § 17; 1991, ch. 28, § 14; 1991, ch. 53, § 3; 1995, ch. 31, § 5; 1997, ch. 9, § 6; 1999, ch. 31, § 2; 2001, ch. 9, § 2; 2005, ch. 9, § 8; 2005, ch. 15, § 10; 2007, ch. 36, § 17; 2009, ch. 9, § 11; 2011, ch. 35, § 9; 2013, ch. 9, § 8; 2015, ch. 43, § 8, effective July 1, 2015; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-01-22.
Certified beef program. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 57, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-01-23.
Sustainably grown in North Dakota — Application — Logo — Promotion of commodities. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 68, § 1; 2011, ch. 35, § 10; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-01-24.
Advisory committee on sustainable agriculture — Creation — Duties — Powers — Compensation — Continuing appropriation. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 68, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-01-25.
Grape and wine program committee. [Repealed]

Expired by S.L. 2009, ch. 69, § 4.

4-01-26.
Commodity groups — Agriculture commissioner — Meetings. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 70, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-01-27.
Publicly owned land — Noxious weed control or eradication. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 71, § 3; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-01-28.
Equine slaughter — Establishments. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 59, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-01-29.
Agricultural wetland credits — Database. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 65, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-01-30.
Grape and wine advisory committee — Membership. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 66, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-01-31.
Pipeline restoration and reclamation oversight pilot program — Generally.
[Repealed]

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 63, § 1, effective April 13, 2015; repealed by 2017, sb2026, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

Note.

Section 04-01-31 was amended 1 time and repealed by the 2017 Legislative Assembly.

Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is treated as repealed. Section 1 of Chapter 62, Session Laws 2017, Senate Bill 2236; and section 13 of Chapter 61, Session Laws 2017, Senate Bill 2026.

4-01-32.
Federal environmental law impact review committee.
[Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2015, hb1432, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-01-33.
Environmental impact — Cost of participation.
[Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2015, ch. 64, § 2, effective July 1, 2015; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-01-34.
Gifts — Grants — Donations. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2015, ch. 64, § 3, effective July 1, 2015; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-01-35.
Federal environmental law impact review fund — Continuing appropriation. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2015, ch. 64, § 4, effective July 1, 2015; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.